Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
349 [OLD]

PROGRAMS
ON AGING

REPEALED. L 1976, c 217, §2.

CHAPTER
349

EXECUTIVE
OFFICE ON AGING

Part I. General Provisions

Section

349-1 Declaration of purpose; support; duties

349-2 Executive office on aging; appointments

349-3 General functions, duties, and powers of
the director

349-3.1 Kupuna care program

349-3.2 Alzheimer's disease and related dementia
services

coordinator

349-4 Policy advisory board for elder affairs;

lifetime honorary kupuna

349-5 Administrative and program support for the
executive

office on aging

349-6 State master plan for elders

349-7 Recognition as responsible state agency

349-8 Powers of other departments and agencies;
cooperation

with the executive office on aging

349-9 County functions

349-10 Annual senior citizen's fair

349-11 State policy for senior centers

349-12 to 14 Renumbered

Part II. Caregiver Support Services

349-15 Coordination and development of caregiver
support

services

Part III. Office of the Long-Term Care
Ombudsman

349-21 Office of the long-term care ombudsman

349-22 Access to long-term care facilities

349-23 Retaliatory acts by facilities or facility
employees

prohibited

349-24 Wilful interference; prohibited

349-25 Posting and distribution of information

Part IV. Aging and Disability Resource
Centers

Program

349-31 Definitions

349-32 Aging and disability resource centers; established

Note

Evaluation reports to 2017-2018 legislature on the
effectiveness of aging and disability resource centers. L 2016, c 138, §2.

Long-term care policy goals and guidelines. L 2008, c 224,
§§2, 3.

Long-term care public education and awareness campaign;
report to 2017 legislature. L 2014, c 151, §§7, 8; L 2015, c 126, §19.

Nursing facility sustainability program (repealed June 30,
2016 and December 31, 2016). L 2012, c 156; L 2013, c 142; L 2014, c 124; L
2015, c 69.

L 2008, c 241, §2 provides:

"SECTION 2. The department of human services shall
apply to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to allow
persons who are eligible to receive medicaid funds for care at nursing home
facilities to remain at home and receive home- and community-based long-term
care; provided that the cost for the home- and community-based services shall
not exceed the total expenditures that would have been incurred if the person
received facility-based long-term care, services, or support."

Progress reports to 2017-2018 legislature on implementation
of 2015 federal No Wrong Door/aging and disability resource center network
implementation grant. L 2016, c 138, §3.

Cross References

Actions or penalties for violations committed against elders,
see §§28-94, 412:3-114.5, 444-10.7, 480-13, 480-13.5, 485A-603.5, 485A-604.5,
and 487-14.

Administration of long term care service development fund,
see §321-22.

Nursing facility sustainability program, see chapter 346F.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next